Maryland, session 2025, SB0522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
4.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(m) (1) “New home” means each newly constructed residential dwelling unit in
the State and the fixtures and structure that are made a part of a newly constructed private
dwelling unit at the time of construction.
(2) “New home” includes:
(i) a custom home as defined in § 10–501(c) of the Real Property
Article;
(ii) a new home to which § 10–301 of the Real Property Article
applies;
(iii) an industrialized building intended for residential use; and
– 1 –

Ch. 295 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) a mobile home.
(r) “Registrant” means a person registered to build new homes.
4.5–603.
(a) (1) This subsection applies only to a development that contains 11 or more
new homes to be built by the same registrant.
(2) Prior to the execution of any contract for the initial sale of a new home,
a registrant shall provide the purchaser with written information about any
energy–efficient options, including a statement that tax credits may be available related to
the energy–efficient options, that are available for installation in the home before
construction of the home is completed.
(b) A registrant shall include in any contract for the initial sale of a new home:
(1) FOR EACH APPLIANCE IN THE NEW HOME, INCLUDING THE
HEATING, VENTILATION, AND AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM, THAT WAS REGISTERED
BY THE REGISTRANT, THE WARRANTY INFORMATION FOR THE APPLIANCE,
INCLUDING:
(I) THE DATE THE REGISTRANT REGISTERED THE WARRANTY;
AND
(II) THE TIME REMAINING UNDER THE WARRANTY; AND
(2) the information required under § 14–117(a)(3), (i), and (m) of the Real
Property Article, if applicable.
4.5–606.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “APPLIANCE” INCLUDES A HEATING, VENTILATION,
AND AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM.
(B) A REGISTRANT SHALL PROVIDE, AT THE TIME OF CLOSING FOR THE
INITIAL SALE OF A NEW HOME, THE WARRANTY INFORMATION FOR EACH APPLIANCE
IN THE NEW HOME THAT WAS REGISTERED BY THE REGISTRANT, INCLUDING:
(1) THE DATE THE REGISTRANT REGISTERED THE WARRANTY; AND
(2) THE TIME REMAINING UNDER THE WARRANTY.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 295
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –